District of Columbia statutes.
4-1704.07

LRAP; rulemaking.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 407
as added Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3002(b), 58 DCR 6226

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-1704.05.